District of Columbia statutes.
Subpoenas

11-942

Subpenas

(a)

The Superior Court may compel the attendance of witnesses by attachment. At the request of any party, subpenas [subpoenas] for attendance at a hearing or trial in the Superior Court shall be issued by the clerk of court. A subpena [subpoena] may be served at any place within the District of Columbia, or at any place without the District of Columbia that is within twenty-five miles of the place of the hearing or trial specified in the subpena [subpoena]. The form, issuance, and manner of service of the subpena [subpoena] shall be as prescribed by the rule of the court.

(b)

A subpena [subpoena] in a criminal case in which a felony is charged may be served at any place within the United States upon order of a judge of the court.

History

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 487, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 111

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 11-942.
1973 Ed., § 11-942.

Editor's Notes

Throughout the section, “subpoena” and “subpoenas” were inserted, in brackets, to correct misspellings.